District of Columbia statutes.
26-1152.20

Broker licensor.

Upon initiation of a business relationship with a mortgage broker, a lender shall verify that each mortgage broker with whom it does business in connection with making a covered loan is licensed or otherwise authorized to do business in the District. After verifying that the broker is licensed or authorized to do business in the District, the lender shall be entitled thereafter to rely upon a signed written statement by the mortgage broker that the mortgage broker is duly authorized to conduct business in the District unless the lender has notice that the mortgage broker is not licensed or authorized to do business in the District; provided, that the lender has provided the Mayor with a name, telephone number, mailing address, and electronic mail address of a contact to whom the Mayor can provide updates or amendments to the list of licensed brokers.

May 7, 2002, D.C. Law 14-132, § 220, 49 DCR 2551

History

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 220 of Home Loan Protection Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-295, March 1, 2002, 49 DCR 2534).

Emergency Legislation